District of Columbia statutes.
38-1975

Repealed

Evening, summer, and Americanization schools; salaries.

Repealed.

Aug. 5, 1955, 69 Stat. 529, ch. 569, title V, § 13
Aug. 28, 1958, 72 Stat. 1011, Pub. L. 85-838, § 1
Oct. 24, 1962, 76 Stat. 1234, Pub. L. 87-881, title I, § 101(10), (11)
Sept. 2, 1964, 78 Stat. 886, Pub. L. 88-875, title II, § 201(3)
Nov. 13, 1966, 80 Stat. 1601, Pub. L. 89-810, title II, § 202(8)
May 27, 1968, 82 Stat. 138, Pub. L. 90-319, § 2(6)
May 27, 1968, 82 Stat. 139, Pub. L. 90-319, § 2(7)
June 30, 1970, 84 Stat. 363, Pub. L. 91-297, title III, § 302(9), (10)
Oct. 21, 1972, 86 Stat. 1008, Pub. L. 92-518, title I, §§ 102(b), 103(6)
Sept. 3, 1974, 88 Stat. 1049, Pub. L. 93-407, title II, § 202(3), (4)
Jan. 3, 1975, 88 Stat. 2177, Pub. L. 93-635, § 11
Mar. 29, 1977, D.C. Law 1-90, § 2(5), 23 DCR 9523b
May 18, 1977, D.C. Law 2-1, § 2(b), 23 DCR 9698
Mar. 16, 1982, D.C. Law 4-78, § 11, 29 DCR 49
1981 Ed., § 31-1141.
1973 Ed., § 31-1542.
For temporary amendment of section, see § 206(b) of the Police Officers, Fire Fighters, and Teachers Retirement Benefit Replacement Plan and Fiscal Year 1998 Revised Budget Support Act of 1997 Technical Amendments Emergency Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-351, May 20, 1998, 45 DCR 3673), and § 206(b) of the Police Officers, Fire Fighters, and Teachers Retirement Benefit Replacement Plan and Fiscal Year 1998 Revised Budget Support Act of 1997 Technical Amendments Congressional Review Emergency Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-432, August 6, 1998, 45 DCR 5920).